Hawaii statutes.
[§342J-41] Technical assistance to
generators. (a) The department shall establish a technical assistance
program for generators of hazardous waste in the State. The program shall be
designed to assist generators in obtaining information concerning hazardous
waste management:

(1) To identify and apply methods of reducing the
generation of hazardous wastes;

(2) To facilitate improved management of hazardous
waste and compliance with the department’s requirements; and

(3) For other similar purposes.

The program shall emphasize assistance to the
smaller businesses and small quantity generators that have limited technical
and financial resources for obtaining information, assessing hazardous waste
management methods, and developing and applying hazardous waste reduction
techniques. Information and techniques developed under this program shall be
made available to all generators in the State.

(b) The assistance program shall include at
least the following elements:

(1) Outreach programs, including on-site consultation
at locations where hazardous waste is generated, seminars, workshops, training
programs, and other similar activities designed to assist generators in
evaluating their hazardous waste generation and management practices,
identifying opportunities for waste reduction and improved management, and
identifying subjects that require additional information and research;

(2) A program to assemble, catalog, and disseminate
information about hazardous waste reduction and management methods, available
commercial waste management facilities and consultant services, and regulatory
programs;

(3) Evaluation and interpretation of information
needed by generators to improve their management of hazardous waste; and

(4) Informational and technical research to identify
alternative technical solutions that can be applied by specific generators to
reduce the generation of hazardous waste.

(c) The program shall be coordinated with
other public and private programs that provide management and technical
assistance to smaller businesses and small quantity generators, including any
program operated by a public or private educational institution. [L 1989, c
212, pt of §5]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next